en: Frozen roasted French fries, Frozen baked French fries, Frozen roasted French chips
da: Frosne ristede pomfritter
fr: Frites de pommes de terre surgelées cuites au four, Frites de pommes de terre surgelées rôties

en: Frozen French fries to roast, Frozen French fries to bake, Frozen French chips to roast, Frozen French chips to bake
da: Frosne pomfritter til ristning, Frosne pomfritter til bagning
fr: Frites surgelées à cuire au four, Frites de pommes de terre surgelées à rôtir, Frites de pommes de terre surgelées à cuire au four

en: Microwave potato fries, Microwave fries
da: Mikrobølgeovnspomfritter
de: Mikrowellen-Pommes
es: Papas fritas para microondas
fi: Mikroaaltouunissa valmistettavat ranskalaiset perunat
fr: Frites micro-ondables
hr: Krumpirići u mikrovalnoj
lt: Mikrobangų bulvytės
nl: Magnetron frietjes
pl: Frytki do podgrzewania w mikrofalówce
pt: Batatas fritas para micro-ondas
ru: Картофель фри для микроволновой печи

en: Frozen microwave fries, Frozen French fries intended to be microwaved, Frozen French chips intended to be microwaved
da: Frosne mikrobølgeovnspomfritter
fr: Frites surgelées micro-ondables, Frites de pommes de terre surgelées pour cuisson au micro-ondes

en: Frozen deep-fried French fries, Frozen deep-fried French chips
da: Frosne friturestegte pomfritter
fr: Frites de pommes de terre surgelées cuites en friteuse

en: Frozen French fries to deep-fry, Frozen chips to deep-fry
da: Frosne pomfritter til friturestegning
fr: Frites surgelées pour friteuse, Frites de pommes de terre pour cuisson en friteuse

en: Waffle potato fries, Waffle fries
da: Vaffelpomfritter, Waffle fries
eo: Vaflecaj terpomfritoj
ko: 벌집감자
sv: Våffel pommes frites, Waffle pommes frites, Waffle fries
zh: 薯格

en: Frozen waffle potato fries, Frozen waffle fries
da: Frosne vaffelpomfritter
sv: Frysta våffel pommes frites, Frysta waffle fries

en: Frozen fried potato cubes
da: Frosne stegte kartoffeltern
fr: Pommes de terre rissolées surgelées

en: Frozen cooked pre-fried potato cubes
da: Frosne kogte forstegte kartoffeltern
fr: Pommes rissolées surgelées cuites, Pommes de terre rissolées surgelées cuites

da: Frosne kartoffelkroketter
fr: Croquettes de pommes de terre surgelées
hr: Smrznuti kroketi od krumpira

en: Frozen desserts
bg: Замразени десерти
ca: Postres congelats
de: Tiefkühl-Desserts
es: Postres helados, Postres congelados
fi: Jälkiruokapakasteet
fr: Desserts glacés, Desserts surgelés
he: קינוחים קפואים
hr: Smrznuti deserti
hu: Fagyasztott desszertek
it: Dessert surgelati
lt: Šaldyti desertai
nl: Bevroren desserts
pl: Mrożone desery
pt: Sobremesas congeladas
ru: Холодные десерты
sv: Frysta efterrätter
tr: Dondurulmuş tatlılar
zh: 冷冻甜点

en: Layered ice cream blocks, Frozen dessert puff pastry, Frozen dessert puff pastry to share
fr: Feuilletés glacés, Dessert glacé feuilleté, Dessert glacé feuilleté à partager

en: Baked Alaska
fr: Omelettes norvégiennes glacées, Omelette norvégienne

en: Belle Helene pear dessert, Cooked pear topped with hot chocolate sauce on a bed of vanilla ice cream
fr: Poire belle Hélène

en: Vacherin ice cream
fr: Vacherin glacé

en: Ice cream ball filled and coated, Frozen dessert ice cream with meringue, Mystery ice cream
fr: Boules de crème glacée fourrées et nappées, Mystère

en: Sundae ice cream
fr: Sundae
hr: Sundae sladoled
ja: サンデー, パフェ
lt: Sundae ledai

de: Wassereisbecher
fr: Glaces à l'eau en pot

en: Ice creams and sorbets, Flavoured ice creams, Flavoured sorbets, Flavoured ice pops
bg: Сладолед и сорбе
ca: Sorbets i gelats
da: Is og sorbeter
de: Speiseeis und Sorbets, Eiskrem und Sorbets
es: Helados y sorbetes
fi: jäätelöt ja sorbetit
fr: Glaces et sorbets, Sorbets et glaces
he: גלידות וסורבה
hr: sladoledi i sorbeti
hu: Jégkrém és parfé
it: Gelati e sorbetti
lt: Ledai ir šerbetai
nl: IJs en sorbets
pl: Lody i sorbety
pt: Gelados e sorvetes
ru: Мороженное
sv: Glass och sorbeter
zh: 冰淇淋和果汁冰糕